California, session 20252026, AB2565.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14132.967 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, immediately preceding Section 14132.968, to read:14132.967. (a) The department shall issue guidance, including, but not limited to, an all-plan letter or similar instruction, clarifying Medi-Cal managed care plan obligations to cover pharmacist services pursuant to Section 14132.968 and applicable state plan amendments.(b) The guidance issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:(1) Requirements for coverage of pharmacist services consistent with Section 14132.968 and applicable state plan amendments.(2) Expectations for timely and appropriate reimbursement of pharmacist services.(3) Requirements for managed care plans to ensure accountability for coverage of pharmacist services at the delegated entity level, including independent physician associations or other subcontractors, where applicable.(4) Requirements that coverage of pharmacist services be clearly reflected in provider manuals, billing guidance, and claims processing systems.(c) The department shall update its model evidence of coverage to explicitly include coverage of pharmacist services described in Section 14132.968.(d) If the department determines that a Medi-Cal managed care plan, or its delegated entity, has failed to comply with Section 14132.968, applicable state plan amendments, or departmental guidance issued pursuant to this section, the department shall take appropriate corrective action pursuant to its existing authority, including enforcement actions and the imposition of sanctions, as appropriate.(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of all-plan letters, plan letters, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.SECTION 1.Section 14132.967 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, immediately preceding Section 14132.968, to read:14132.967.(a)The department shall require each Medi-Cal managed care plan to submit an annual report to the department containing information about pharmacist services provided pursuant to Section 14132.968 and that are within the jurisdiction of Medi-Cal managed care plans and not within the jurisdiction of the fee-for-service delivery system under the Medi-Cal Rx program.(b)The department shall compile the information submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) and shall submit an annual consolidated report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, no later than March 1 of each year. The deadline for the initial consolidated report shall be March 1, 2028.(c)The consolidated report described in subdivision (b) shall contain all of the following information:(1)Implementation and compliance, including all of the following:(A)The extent to which the department has implemented Section 14132.968, including identification of any remaining implementation barriers or delays.(B)The department’s compliance with State Plan Amendments 18-0039, 19-0017, and 20-0036.(C)Whether Medi-Cal managed care plans are complying with departmental guidance relating to pharmacist services, as described in subdivision (a), including any identified instances of noncompliance.(2)Access to pharmacist services, including both of the following:(A)The uniformity of beneficiary access to pharmacist services statewide, including utilization data by service type.(B)Identification of disparities in access by county, region, or underserved area, including rural, urban, and frontier communities, with data disaggregated by geography, beneficiary demographics, and managed care plan, to the extent feasible.(3)(A)Claims payment and processing, including all of the following:(i)The total number of claims submitted for pharmacist services, as described in subdivision (a), disaggregated by service type, and the number of claims paid, denied, or pending.(ii)The primary reasons for claim denials, categorized and quantified.(iii)Identification of any criteria used by the department or a managed care plan for payment or denial that are inconsistent with Section 14132.968 or with the applicable State Plan Amendments.(iv)The reimbursement rates for each pharmacist service, as described in subdivision (a), as paid by a managed care plan, including identification of any variation by plan or delegated entity.(v)Whether pharmacist services described in subdivision (a) are included in the managed care plan’s provider manuals, billing guidance, and encounter reporting systems.(vi)The average and median number of days from claim submission to payment or denial, disaggregated by service type and managed care plan.(B)For purposes of this section, reporting requirements shall include data from any delegated entity, independent physician association, or subcontractor responsible for claims processing, credentialing, or utilization management of pharmacist services.(4)Oversight and enforcement, including all of the following:(A)The methods used by the department to monitor managed care plan compliance with Section 14132.968.(B)Any corrective actions taken by the department pursuant to its existing authority, including the type of action and outcome.(C)The number of provider complaints received by the department relating to pharmacist services, categorized by issue type and resolution status.(5)Fiscal and public health impact, including both of the following:(A)The estimated fiscal and public health impacts of underutilization of pharmacist services under the Medi-Cal program.(B)Estimated cost savings forgone by the state resulting from underutilization of pharmacist services, including, but not limited to, tobacco cessation, hypertension management, contraception, immunizations, and other pharmacist-delivered services.(d)The consolidated report described in subdivision (b) shall be made publicly available and shall include only aggregated, deidentified data, as necessary to comply with state and federal privacy requirements.(e)If the department determines that a Medi-Cal managed care plan has failed to comply with Section 14132.968, applicable State Plan Amendments, applicable departmental guidance, or this section, the department shall take appropriate corrective action, including enforcement action and the imposition of sanctions pursuant to Section 14197.7 or any other applicable provisions, if a pattern of noncompliance is identified.(f)Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of all-county letters, plan letters, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.